New.aff
# Cross product of present tense negative subject markers (C) and object markers (F)
PFX S Y 590
PFX S 0 simu .
PFX S 0 siba .
PFX S 0 sigu .
PFX S 0 sigi .
PFX S 0 sizi .
PFX S 0 siki .
PFX S 0 sibi .
PFX S 0 sili .
PFX S 0 siga .
PFX S 0 sika .
PFX S 0 sibu .
PFX S 0 silu .
PFX S 0 siku .
PFX S 0 situ .
PFX S 0 ton [^lmn]
PFX S l tond l.[^mn]
PFX S l tonn l.[mn]
PFX S w tomp [w]
PFX S 0 tomu .
PFX S 0 toba .
PFX S 0 togu .
PFX S 0 togi .
PFX S 0 tozi .
PFX S 0 toki .
PFX S 0 tobi .
PFX S 0 toli .
PFX S 0 toga .
PFX S 0 toka .
PFX S 0 tobu .
PFX S 0 tolu .
PFX S 0 toku .
PFX S 0 totu .
PFX S 0 tan [^lmn]
PFX S l tand l.[^mn]
PFX S l tann l.[mn]
PFX S w tamp [w]
PFX S 0 tamu .
PFX S 0 taba .
PFX S 0 tagu .
PFX S 0 tagi .
PFX S 0 tazi .
PFX S 0 taki .
PFX S 0 tabi .
PFX S 0 tali .
PFX S 0 taga .
PFX S 0 taka .
PFX S 0 tabu .
PFX S 0 talu .
PFX S 0 taku .
PFX S 0 tatu .
PFX S 0 tetun [^lmn]
PFX S l tetund l.[^mn]
PFX S l tetunn l.[mn]
PFX S w tetump [w]
PFX S 0 tetumu .
PFX S 0 tetuba .
PFX S 0 tetugu .
PFX S 0 tetugi .
PFX S 0 tetuzi .
PFX S 0 tetuki .
PFX S 0 tetubi .
PFX S 0 tetuli .
PFX S 0 tetuga .
PFX S 0 tetuka .
PFX S 0 tetubu .
PFX S 0 tetulu .
PFX S 0 tetuku .
PFX S 0 tetutu .
PFX S 0 temun [^lmn]
PFX S l temund l.[^mn]
PFX S l temunn l.[mn]
PFX S w temump [w]
PFX S 0 temumu .
PFX S 0 temuba .
PFX S 0 temugu .
PFX S 0 temugi .
PFX S 0 temuzi .
PFX S 0 temuki .
PFX S 0 temubi .
PFX S 0 temuli .
PFX S 0 temuga .
PFX S 0 temuka .
PFX S 0 temubu .
PFX S 0 temulu .
PFX S 0 temuku .
PFX S 0 temutu .
PFX S 0 teban [^lmn]
PFX S l teband l.[^mn]
PFX S l tebann l.[mn]
PFX S w tebamp [w]
PFX S 0 tebamu .
PFX S 0 tebaba .
PFX S 0 tebagu .
PFX S 0 tebagi .
PFX S 0 tebazi .
PFX S 0 tebaki .
PFX S 0 tebabi .
PFX S 0 tebali .
PFX S 0 tebaga .
PFX S 0 tebaka .
PFX S 0 tebabu .
PFX S 0 tebalu .
PFX S 0 tebaku .
PFX S 0 tebatu .
PFX S 0 abatan [^lmn]
PFX S l abatand l.[^mn]
PFX S l abatann l.[mn]
PFX S w abatamp [w]
PFX S 0 abatamu .
PFX S 0 abataba .
PFX S 0 abatagu .
PFX S 0 abatagi .
PFX S 0 abatazi .
PFX S 0 abataki .
PFX S 0 abatabi .
PFX S 0 abatali .
PFX S 0 abataga .
PFX S 0 abataka .
PFX S 0 abatabu .
PFX S 0 abatalu .
PFX S 0 abataku .
PFX S 0 abatatu .
PFX S 0 tegun [^lmn]
PFX S l tegund l.[^mn]
PFX S l tegunn l.[mn]
PFX S w tegump [w]
PFX S 0 tegumu .
PFX S 0 teguba .
PFX S 0 tegugu .
PFX S 0 tegugi .
PFX S 0 teguzi .
PFX S 0 teguki .
PFX S 0 tegubi .
PFX S 0 teguli .
PFX S 0 teguga .
PFX S 0 teguka .
PFX S 0 tegubu .
PFX S 0 tegulu .
PFX S 0 teguku .
PFX S 0 tegutu .
PFX S 0 ogutan [^lmn]
PFX S l ogutand l.[^mn]
PFX S l ogutann l.[mn]
PFX S w ogutamp [w]
PFX S 0 ogutamu .
PFX S 0 ogutaba .
PFX S 0 ogutagu .
PFX S 0 ogutagi .
PFX S 0 ogutazi .
PFX S 0 ogutaki .
PFX S 0 ogutabi .
PFX S 0 ogutali .
PFX S 0 ogutaga .
PFX S 0 ogutaka .
PFX S 0 ogutabu .
PFX S 0 ogutalu .
PFX S 0 ogutaku .
PFX S 0 ogutatu .
PFX S 0 tegin [^lmn]
PFX S l tegind l.[^mn]
PFX S l teginn l.[mn]
PFX S w tegimp [w]
PFX S 0 tegimu .
PFX S 0 tegiba .
PFX S 0 tegigu .
PFX S 0 tegigi .
PFX S 0 tegizi .
PFX S 0 tegiki .
PFX S 0 tegibi .
PFX S 0 tegili .
PFX S 0 tegiga .
PFX S 0 tegika .
PFX S 0 tegibu .
PFX S 0 tegilu .
PFX S 0 tegiku .
PFX S 0 tegitu .
PFX S 0 egitan [^lmn]
PFX S l egitand l.[^mn]
PFX S l egitann l.[mn]
PFX S w egitamp [w]
PFX S 0 egitamu .
PFX S 0 egitaba .
PFX S 0 egitagu .
PFX S 0 egitagi .
PFX S 0 egitazi .
PFX S 0 egitaki .
PFX S 0 egitabi .
PFX S 0 egitali .
PFX S 0 egitaga .
PFX S 0 egitaka .
PFX S 0 egitabu .
PFX S 0 egitalu .
PFX S 0 egitaku .
PFX S 0 egitatu .
PFX S 0 ten [^lmn]
PFX S l tend l.[^mn]
PFX S l tenn l.[mn]
PFX S w temp [w]
PFX S 0 temu .
PFX S 0 teba .
PFX S 0 tegu .
PFX S 0 tegi .
PFX S 0 tezi .
PFX S 0 teki .
PFX S 0 tebi .
PFX S 0 teli .
PFX S 0 tega .
PFX S 0 teka .
PFX S 0 tebu .
PFX S 0 telu .
PFX S 0 teku .
PFX S 0 tetu .
PFX S 0 eten [^lmn]
PFX S l etend l.[^mn]
PFX S l etenn l.[mn]
PFX S w etemp [w]
PFX S 0 etemu .
PFX S 0 eteba .
PFX S 0 etegu .
PFX S 0 etegi .
PFX S 0 etezi .
PFX S 0 eteki .
PFX S 0 etebi .
PFX S 0 eteli .
PFX S 0 etega .
PFX S 0 eteka .
PFX S 0 etebu .
PFX S 0 etelu .
PFX S 0 eteku .
PFX S 0 etetu .
PFX S 0 tezin [^lmn]
PFX S l tezind l.[^mn]
PFX S l tezinn l.[mn]
PFX S w tezimp [w]
PFX S 0 tezimu .
PFX S 0 teziba .
PFX S 0 tezigu .
PFX S 0 tezigi .
PFX S 0 tezizi .
PFX S 0 teziki .
PFX S 0 tezibi .
PFX S 0 tezili .
PFX S 0 teziga .
PFX S 0 tezika .
PFX S 0 tezibu .
PFX S 0 tezilu .
PFX S 0 teziku .
PFX S 0 tezitu .
PFX S 0 ezitan [^lmn]
PFX S l ezitand l.[^mn]
PFX S l ezitann l.[mn]
PFX S w ezitamp [w]
PFX S 0 ezitamu .
PFX S 0 ezitaba .
PFX S 0 ezitagu .
PFX S 0 ezitagi .
PFX S 0 ezitazi .
PFX S 0 ezitaki .
PFX S 0 ezitabi .
PFX S 0 ezitali .
PFX S 0 ezitaga .
PFX S 0 ezitaka .
PFX S 0 ezitabu .
PFX S 0 ezitalu .
PFX S 0 ezitaku .
PFX S 0 ezitatu .
PFX S 0 tekin [^lmn]
PFX S l tekind l.[^mn]
PFX S l tekinn l.[mn]
PFX S w tekimp [w]
PFX S 0 tekimu .
PFX S 0 tekiba .
PFX S 0 tekigu .
PFX S 0 tekigi .
PFX S 0 tekizi .
PFX S 0 tekiki .
PFX S 0 tekibi .
PFX S 0 tekili .
PFX S 0 tekiga .
PFX S 0 tekika .
PFX S 0 tekibu .
PFX S 0 tekilu .
PFX S 0 tekiku .
PFX S 0 tekitu .
PFX S 0 ekitan [^lmn]
PFX S l ekitand l.[^mn]
PFX S l ekitann l.[mn]
PFX S w ekitamp [w]
PFX S 0 ekitamu .
PFX S 0 ekitaba .
PFX S 0 ekitagu .
PFX S 0 ekitagi .
PFX S 0 ekitazi .
PFX S 0 ekitaki .
PFX S 0 ekitabi .
PFX S 0 ekitali .
PFX S 0 ekitaga .
PFX S 0 ekitaka .
PFX S 0 ekitabu .
PFX S 0 ekitalu .
PFX S 0 ekitaku .
PFX S 0 ekitatu .
PFX S 0 tebin [^lmn]
PFX S l tebind l.[^mn]
PFX S l tebinn l.[mn]
PFX S w tebimp [w]
PFX S 0 tebimu .
PFX S 0 tebiba .
PFX S 0 tebigu .
PFX S 0 tebigi .
PFX S 0 tebizi .
PFX S 0 tebiki .
PFX S 0 tebibi .
PFX S 0 tebili .
PFX S 0 tebiga .
PFX S 0 tebika .
PFX S 0 tebibu .
PFX S 0 tebilu .
PFX S 0 tebiku .
PFX S 0 tebitu .
PFX S 0 ebitan [^lmn]
PFX S l ebitand l.[^mn]
PFX S l ebitann l.[mn]
PFX S w ebitamp [w]
PFX S 0 ebitamu .
PFX S 0 ebitaba .
PFX S 0 ebitagu .
PFX S 0 ebitagi .
PFX S 0 ebitazi .
PFX S 0 ebitaki .
PFX S 0 ebitabi .
PFX S 0 ebitali .
PFX S 0 ebitaga .
PFX S 0 ebitaka .
PFX S 0 ebitabu .
PFX S 0 ebitalu .
PFX S 0 ebitaku .
PFX S 0 ebitatu .
PFX S 0 telin [^lmn]
PFX S l telind l.[^mn]
PFX S l telinn l.[mn]
PFX S w telimp [w]
PFX S 0 telimu .
PFX S 0 teliba .
PFX S 0 teligu .
PFX S 0 teligi .
PFX S 0 telizi .
PFX S 0 teliki .
PFX S 0 telibi .
PFX S 0 telili .
PFX S 0 teliga .
PFX S 0 telika .
PFX S 0 telibu .
PFX S 0 telilu .
PFX S 0 teliku .
PFX S 0 telitu .
PFX S 0 elitan [^lmn]
PFX S l elitand l.[^mn]
PFX S l elitann l.[mn]
PFX S w elitamp [w]
PFX S 0 elitamu .
PFX S 0 elitaba .
PFX S 0 elitagu .
PFX S 0 elitagi .
PFX S 0 elitazi .
PFX S 0 elitaki .
PFX S 0 elitabi .
PFX S 0 elitali .
PFX S 0 elitaga .
PFX S 0 elitaka .
PFX S 0 elitabu .
PFX S 0 elitalu .
PFX S 0 elitaku .
PFX S 0 elitatu .
PFX S 0 tegan [^lmn]
PFX S l tegand l.[^mn]
PFX S l tegann l.[mn]
PFX S w tegamp [w]
PFX S 0 tegamu .
PFX S 0 tegaba .
PFX S 0 tegagu .
PFX S 0 tegagi .
PFX S 0 tegazi .
PFX S 0 tegaki .
PFX S 0 tegabi .
PFX S 0 tegali .
PFX S 0 tegaga .
PFX S 0 tegaka .
PFX S 0 tegabu .
PFX S 0 tegalu .
PFX S 0 tegaku .
PFX S 0 tegatu .
PFX S 0 agatan [^lmn]
PFX S l agatand l.[^mn]
PFX S l agatann l.[mn]
PFX S w agatamp [w]
PFX S 0 agatamu .
PFX S 0 agataba .
PFX S 0 agatagu .
PFX S 0 agatagi .
PFX S 0 agatazi .
PFX S 0 agataki .
PFX S 0 agatabi .
PFX S 0 agatali .
PFX S 0 agataga .
PFX S 0 agataka .
PFX S 0 agatabu .
PFX S 0 agatalu .
PFX S 0 agataku .
PFX S 0 agatatu .
PFX S 0 tekan [^lmn]
PFX S l tekand l.[^mn]
PFX S l tekann l.[mn]
PFX S w tekamp [w]
PFX S 0 tekamu .
PFX S 0 tekaba .
PFX S 0 tekagu .
PFX S 0 tekagi .
PFX S 0 tekazi .
PFX S 0 tekaki .
PFX S 0 tekabi .
PFX S 0 tekali .
PFX S 0 tekaga .
PFX S 0 tekaka .
PFX S 0 tekabu .
PFX S 0 tekalu .
PFX S 0 tekaku .
PFX S 0 tekatu .
PFX S 0 akatan [^lmn]
PFX S l akatand l.[^mn]
PFX S l akatann l.[mn]
PFX S w akatamp [w]
PFX S 0 akatamu .
PFX S 0 akataba .
PFX S 0 akatagu .
PFX S 0 akatagi .
PFX S 0 akatazi .
PFX S 0 akataki .
PFX S 0 akatabi .
PFX S 0 akatali .
